en: Rug Pads
xx: Rug Pads
cs: Podložky pod koberce
da: Tæppeunderlag
de: Teppichunterlagen
es: Acolchado para alfombras
fr: Thibaudes, Thibaude
it: Sottotappeto
ja: ラグ用下敷き
nl: Antislipmatten
no: Teppeunderlag
pl: Podkładki pod dywany
pt: Almofadões
ru: Основы для ковров
sv: Halkskydd för mattor
tr: Halı Altlıkları

en: Shoe Care & Tools
xx: Shoe Care & Tools
cs: Pomůcky pro péči o obuv
da: Skopleje og redskaber
de: Schuhpflege
es: Cuidado del calzado
fr: Entretien et accessoires pour chaussures
it: Cura delle scarpe
ja: 靴のお手入れ
nl: Schoenverzorging
no: Skopleie og -verktøy
pl: Środki i narzędzia do pielęgnacji obuwia
pt: Manutenção e ferramentas para sapatos
ru: Уход за обувью
sv: Skovård och skoverktyg
tr: Ayakkabı Bakım ve Aletleri

en: Boot Pulls
xx: Boot Pulls
cs: Háky na obouvání
da: Støvleknægte
de: Stiefelknechte
es: Descalzadores de botas
fr: Retire-bottes
it: Calzastivali
ja: ブーツフック
nl: Laarzenknecht
no: Støvelknekter
pl: Przyrządy do zdejmowania butów
pt: Tiradores de botas
ru: Крючки для обуви
sv: Stövelknektar
tr: Çizme Çekecekleri

en: Shoe Bags
xx: Shoe Bags
cs: Pytle na boty
da: Skoposer
de: Schuhbeutel
es: Bolsas para zapatos
fr: Sacs à chaussures
it: Borse per scarpe
ja: シューズケース
nl: Schoenenzakken
no: Skoposer
pl: Torby na buty
pt: Sacos para sapatos
ru: Сумки для обуви
sv: Skopåsar
tr: Ayakkabı Çantaları

en: Shoe Brushes
xx: Shoe Brushes
cs: Kartáče na boty
da: Skobørster
de: Schuhbürsten
es: Cepillos para zapatos
fr: Brosses à chaussures
it: Spazzole da scarpe
ja: 靴ブラシ
nl: Schoenborstels
no: Skobørster
pl: Szczotki do butów
pt: Escovas de sapato
ru: Щётки для обуви
sv: Skoborstar
tr: Ayakkabı Fırçaları

en: Shoe Care Kits
xx: Shoe Care Kits
cs: Sady pro péči o obuv
da: Skopudsersæt
de: Schuhpflegesets
es: Kits para el cuidado del calzado
fr: Kits d'entretien de chaussures
it: Kit per la cura delle scarpe
ja: 靴お手入れセット
nl: Schoenverzorgingssets
no: Skopussesett
pl: Zestawy do pielęgnacji obuwia
pt: Kits para cuidados com sapatos
ru: Наборы для ухода за обувью
sv: Skovårdskit
tr: Ayakkabı Bakım Setleri

en: Shoe Dryers
xx: Shoe Dryers
cs: Vysoušeče bot
da: Skotørrere
de: Schuhtrockner
es: Secadores para zapatos
fr: Sèche-chaussures
it: Asciugatori scarpe
ja: 靴乾燥機
nl: Schoendrogers
no: Skotørkere
pl: Suszarki do butów
pt: Secadores de sapatos
ru: Сушилки для обуви
sv: Skotorkare
tr: Ayakkabı Kurutucular

en: Shoe Horns & Dressing Aids
xx: Shoe Horns & Dressing Aids
cs: Nazouvací lžíce
da: Skohorn
de: Schuhanzieher
es: Calzadores
fr: Chausse-pieds et aide à l'habillage
it: Calzascarpe e ausili per vestirsi
ja: 靴べら
nl: Schoenlepels
no: Skohorn og hjelpemidler til påkledning
pl: Łyżki do butów
pt: Calçadeiras
ru: Рожки для обуви
sv: Skohorn och påklädningshjälpmedel
tr: Keratalar ve Giyim Yardımcıları

en: Shoe Polishers
xx: Shoe Polishers
cs: Leštičky bot
da: Skopudsning
de: Schuhpolierer
es: Pulidoras para calzado
fr: Cireuses à chaussures
it: Lucidascarpe
ja: 靴磨き
nl: Schoenpoetsmachines
no: Skopussemaskiner
pl: Polerki do butów
pt: Polidor de sapatos
ru: Средства для чистки обуви
sv: Skokrämer
tr: Ayakkabı Parlatıcıları

en: Shoe Polishes & Waxes
xx: Shoe Polishes & Waxes
cs: Leštidla a vosky na boty
da: Skopudsemiddel og -voks
de: Schuhpolituren & -wachse
es: Betunes y ceras para zapatos
fr: Cirages et cires à chaussures
it: Lucidi e cere scarpe
ja: 靴磨き・靴墨
nl: Schoenpoetsmiddelen
no: Skokrem og -voks
pl: Pasty i woski do butów
pt: Polidores e ceras de engraxar sapatos
ru: Крема и воск для обуви
sv: Skokräm och skoputsmedel
tr: Ayakkabı Parlatıcı ve Cilaları

en: Shoe Scrapers
xx: Shoe Scrapers
cs: Škrabky na obuv
da: Skoskrabere
de: Schuhabstreifer
es: Limpiabarros
fr: Grattoirs à chaussures
it: Pulisciscarpe
ja: 靴用スクレーパー
nl: Schoenschrapers
no: Skoskrapere
pl: Skrobaczki do butów
pt: Limpador de sola de sapato
ru: Скребки для очистки подошв
sv: Skoskrapar
tr: Ayakkabı Paspasları

en: Shoe Treatments & Dyes
xx: Shoe Treatments & Dyes
cs: Prostředky na ošetření a barvení obuvi
da: Skobehandling og -farve
de: Schuhpflege- & Färbemittel
es: Tintes y tratamientos para el calzado
fr: Produits pour l'entretien de chaussures
it: Trattamenti e tinture per scarpe
ja: 靴ケア用品・染料
nl: Schoenbehandelingen en verf
no: Skobehandling og -farge
pl: Środki do pielęgnacji i farbowania butów
pt: Tratamentos e corantes para calçados
ru: Средства по уходу за обувью и краски для обуви
sv: Skobehandling och färgmedel
tr: Ayakkabı Bakım Ürünleri ve Boyaları

en: Shoe Trees & Shapers
xx: Shoe Trees & Shapers
cs: Kopyta a tvarovače bot
da: Skolæste og skostivere
de: Schuhspanner
es: Hormas y ensanchadores de zapatos
fr: Embauchoirs
it: Allargascarpe
ja: シューキーパー・ストレッチャー
nl: Schoenspanners
no: Skostrekkere og -formere
pl: Prawidła do butów
pt: Formas e modeladores para sapatos
ru: Распорки для обуви
sv: Skoblock
tr: Ayakkabı Kalıp ve Şekillendiricileri

en: Stair Treads
xx: Stair Treads
cs: Nášlapy na schody
da: Tæpper til trappetrin
de: Stufenteppiche
es: Alfombrillas para escalones
fr: Revêtements de marches
it: Antiscivolo per scale
ja: 階段用滑り止めマット
nl: Trapmatten
no: Trappetepper
pl: Nakładki na schody
pt: Tapetes antiderrapantes para degraus
ru: Накладки для ступеней
sv: Trappmattor
tr: Merdiven Kaydırmazları

en: Storage & Organization
xx: Storage & Organization
cs: Uskladnění a uspořádání
da: Opbevaring og organisering
de: Aufbewahrung & Ordnungssysteme
es: Organización y almacenamiento
fr: Rangement et organisation
it: Immagazzinamento e organizzazione
ja: 収納
nl: Opruimen en organiseren
no: Oppbevaring og organisering
pl: Przechowywanie i utrzymanie porządku
pt: Armazenamento e organização
ru: Товары для хранения
sv: Förvaring och organisation
tr: Saklama ve Düzenleme

en: Clothing & Closet Storage
xx: Clothing & Closet Storage
cs: Uskladnění oblečení
da: Tøj- og klædeskabe
de: Kleider- & Wandschrankaufbewahrung
es: Almacenamiento de ropa y armarios
fr: Rangements pour armoires à vêtements
it: Abbigliamento e sistemazione negli armadi
ja: 衣類収納用品
nl: Kleding en kledingopslag
no: Klesoppbevaring og skap
pl: Przechowywanie ubrań
pt: Roupas e armazenamento de roupas
ru: Хранение одежды
sv: Kläd- och garderobsförvaring
tr: Elbise Dolapları ve Yüklükler

en: Charging Valets
xx: Charging Valets
cs: Nabíjecí skříňky
da: Opladningskasser
de: Ladestationen
es: Organizadores con cargadores
fr: Stations de recharge décoratives
it: Portatutto
ja: 充電スタンド
nl: Oplaadstations
no: Ladestasjoner
pl: Pudełka na ładowarki
pt: Mesinhas com carregador de dispositivos
ru: Органайзеры для зарядных устройств
sv: Laddningslådor
tr: Çekmeceli Şarj İstasyonları

en: Closet Organizers & Garment Racks
xx: Closet Organizers & Garment Racks
cs: Police na oblečení
da: Tøjstativer
de: Kleiderständer
es: Organizadores de vestidores y perchas de barra
fr: Organiseurs pour armoires et penderies pour vêtements
it: Stand appendiabiti e organizer per armadi
ja: ハンガーラック
nl: Deurhangers voor kleding
no: Skaporganisering og klesstativer
pl: Stojaki na odzież
pt: Cabideiros de vestidos
ru: Напольные вешалки
sv: Klädhängare
tr: Dolap Düzenleyiciler ve Askılıklar

en: Clothes Valets
xx: Clothes Valets
cs: Stojany na oblečení
da: Tøjopbevaring
de: Herrendiener
es: Galanes de noche
fr: Valets de nuit, Valet
it: Omini
ja: バレットスタンド
nl: Kledingstandaards
no: Frakkestativer
pl: Wieszaki stojące na ubrania
pt: Cabideiros de roupas
ru: Стойки для одежды
sv: Herrbetjänter
tr: Kıyafet Çekmeceleri

en: Hangers
xx: Hangers
cs: Ramínka
da: Bøjler
de: Kleiderbügel
es: Perchas
fr: Cintres
it: Appendiabiti
ja: ハンガー
nl: Kleerhangers
no: Kleshengere
pl: Wieszaki
pt: Cabides
ru: Вешалки
sv: Galgar
tr: Elbise Askıları